Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.020

Separate property of domestic partner.

Property and pecuniary rights owned by a person in a state registered domestic partnership before registration of the domestic partnership or afterwards acquired by gift, bequest, devise, descent, or inheritance, with the rents, issues and profits thereof, shall not be subject to the debts or contracts of his or her domestic partner, and he or she may manage, lease, sell, convey, encumber or devise by will such property without his or her domestic partner joining in such management, alienation, or encumbrance, as fully, to the same extent and in the same manner as though he or she were not in a state registered domestic partnership.

[ 2008 c 6 s 603; Code 1881 s 2400; RRS s 6891. Prior: See Reviser's note following RCW 26.16.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: See notes following RCW 26.16.010.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Civil disabilities of wife abolished: RCW 26.16.160.

Earnings of spouse or domestic partner and minor children living apart: RCW 26.16.140.

Exemption of separate property of married person from attachment and execution upon liability of spouse: RCW 6.15.040.